Arkansas, session 2025, SB338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-457. Student farmers.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Student farmer" means an individual under the age of
twenty-three (23) enrolled in a youth farming program; and
(2) "Youth farming program" means:
(A) A chapter of the Arkansas Division of the Future
Farmers of America or other program in the state established by or affiliated
with the Arkansas Division of the Future Farmers of America or Arkansas FFA
Foundation, Inc.;
*CEB033*
02/27/2025 12:46:52 PM CEB033

SB338
(B) A chapter of the Arkansas 4-H program or other program
in the state established by or affiliated with the Arkansas 4-H program or
The Arkansas 4-H Foundation, Incorporated.; or
(C) A student agriculture program in the state similar in
nature to a chapter of the Arkansas Division of the Future Farmers of America
or the Arkansas 4-H program that is under the direction or guidance of an
agricultural educator, advisor, or club leader.
(b) There is an exemption from the gross receipts tax levied by this
chapter and the compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas Compensating Tax
Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq., for the gross receipts or gross proceeds
derived from the sale of the following to a student farmer to be used
directly in relation to a project for a youth farming program:
(1) Feed and feed additives for the purpose of sustaining
livestock and poultry;
(2) Livestock and poultry;
(3) Seeds or plants to be used to produce food ordinarily used
for consumption by humans, livestock, or poultry;
(4) Fertilizer to be used to produce food for consumption by
humans, livestock, or poultry;
(5) Medicine and medical supplies necessary for the treatment of
livestock and poultry;
(6) Farm equipment if the student farmer is listed as the owner
of the farm equipment on all documentation that proves ownership; and
(7) Tools, supplies, and equipment necessary to exhibit
livestock or poultry at a livestock show, fair, competition, or convention.
(c) There is an exemption from the gross receipts tax levied by this
chapter and the compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas Compensating Tax
Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq., for the gross receipts or gross proceeds
derived from the lease or rental of personal property by a student farmer
used to produce a product as a project for a youth farming program.
(d) There is an exemption from the gross receipts tax levied by this
chapter and the compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas Compensating Tax
Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq., for the gross receipts or gross proceeds
derived from furnishing accommodation as described in 26-52-301(3)(A) to a
student farmer or an agricultural educator, advisor, or club leader of a
youth farming program for use while the student farmer is exhibiting at a
02/27/2025 12:46:52 PM CEB033

SB338
livestock show, fair, competition, or convention.
(e)(1) An individual requesting recognition as a student farmer to
claim an exemption under this section shall file with the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration a statement that:
(A) Describes the eligibility of the individual for the
exemption under this section; and
(B) Is signed by the individual requesting recognition as
a student farmer and an agricultural educator, advisor, or club leader of the
youth farming program in which the individual is enrolled.
(2) After receipt of the statement required under subdivision
(e)(1) of this section, the secretary shall issue an exemption certificate to
the student farmer.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective on the
first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act.





















02/27/2025 12:46:52 PM CEB033